Nebraska, session 109, LB46.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB46 LB46
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 68-1017.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
68-1017.02 (1)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
apply for and utilize to the maximum extent possible, within limits
established by the Legislature, any and all appropriate options available
to the state under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
and regulations adopted under such program to maximize the number of
Nebraska residents being served under such program within such limits.
The department shall seek to maximize federal funding for such program
and minimize the utilization of General Funds for such program and shall
employ the personnel necessary to determine the options available to the
state and issue the report to the Legislature required by subdivision (b)
of this subsection.
(b) The department shall submit electronically an annual report to
the Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature by December 1
on efforts by the department to carry out the provisions of this
subsection. Such report shall provide the committee with all necessary
and appropriate information to enable the committee to conduct a
meaningful evaluation of such efforts. Such information shall include,
but not be limited to, a clear description of various options available
to the state under the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program,
the department's evaluation of and any action taken by the department
with respect to such options, the number of persons being served under
such program, and any and all costs and expenditures associated with such
program.
(c) The Health and Human Services Committee of the Legislature,
after receipt and evaluation of the report required in subdivision (b) of
this subsection, shall issue recommendations to the department on any
further action necessary by the department to meet the requirements of
this section.
(2)(a) The department shall develop a state outreach plan to promote
-2-

LB46 LB46
2025 2025
access by eligible persons to benefits of the Supplemental Nutrition
Assistance Program. The plan shall meet the criteria established by the
Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture
for approval of state outreach plans. The Department of Health and Human
Services may apply for and accept gifts, grants, and donations to develop
and implement the state outreach plan.
(b) For purposes of developing and implementing the state outreach
plan, the department shall partner with one or more counties or nonprofit
organizations. If the department enters into a contract with a nonprofit
organization relating to the state outreach plan, the contract may
specify that the nonprofit organization is responsible for seeking
sufficient gifts, grants, or donations necessary for the development and
implementation of the state outreach plan and may additionally specify
that any costs to the department associated with the award and management
of the contract or the implementation or administration of the state
outreach plan shall be paid out of private or federal funds received for
development and implementation of the state outreach plan.
(c) The department shall submit the state outreach plan to the Food
and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of Agriculture for
approval on or before August 1, 2011, and shall request any federal
matching funds that may be available upon approval of the state outreach
plan. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State of Nebraska and
the Department of Health and Human Services use any additional public or
private funds to offset costs associated with increased caseload
resulting from the implementation of the state outreach plan.
(d) The department shall be exempt from implementing or
administering a state outreach plan under this subsection, but not from
developing such a plan, if it does not receive private or federal funds
sufficient to cover the department's costs associated with the
implementation and administration of the plan, including any costs
associated with increased caseload resulting from the implementation of
-3-

LB46 LB46
2025 2025
the plan.
(3)(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(i) Hard work be rewarded and no disincentives to work exist for
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program participants;
(ii) Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program participants be
enabled to advance in employment, through greater earnings or new,
better-paying employment;
(iii) Participants in employment and training pilot programs be able
to maintain Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits while
seeking employment with higher wages that allow them to reduce or
terminate such program benefits; and
(iv) Nebraska better utilize options under the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program that other states have implemented to
encourage work and employment.
(b)(i) The department shall create a TANF-funded program or policy
that, in compliance with federal law, establishes categorical eligibility
for federal food assistance benefits pursuant to the Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program to maximize the number of Nebraska residents
being served under such program in a manner that does not increase the
current gross income eligibility limit except as otherwise provided in
subdivision (3)(b)(ii) of this section.
(ii) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, such TANF-
funded program or policy shall increase the gross income eligibility
limit to one hundred sixty-five percent of the federal Office of
Management and Budget income poverty guidelines as allowed under federal
law and under 7 C.F.R. 273.2(j)(2), as such law and regulation existed on
April 1, 2021, but shall not increase the net income eligibility limit.
Beginning October 1, 2025, the gross income eligibility limit shall
return to the amount used prior to the increase required by this
subdivision. The department shall evaluate the TANF-funded program or
policy created pursuant to this subsection and provide a report
-4-

LB46 LB46
2025 2025
electronically to the Health and Human Services Committee of the
Legislature and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst on or before December 15
of each year regarding the gross income eligibility limit and whether it
maximizes the number of Nebraska residents being served under the program
or policy. The evaluation shall include an identification and
determination of additional administrative costs resulting from the
increase to the gross income eligibility limit, a recommendation
regarding the gross income eligibility limit, and a determination of the
availability of federal funds for the program or policy.
(iii) To the extent federal funds are available to the Department of
Labor for the SNAP Next Step Program, until September 30, 2023, any
recipient of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits whose
household income is between one hundred thirty-one and one hundred sixty-
five percent of the federal Office of Management and Budget income
poverty guidelines and who is not exempt from work participation
requirements shall be encouraged to participate in the SNAP Next Step
Program administered by the Department of Labor if the recipient is
eligible to participate in the program and the program's services are
available in the county in which such household is located. It is the
intent of the Legislature that no General Funds be utilized by the
Department of Labor for the processes outlined in this subdivision (iii).
For purposes of this section, SNAP Next Step Program means a partnership
program between the Department of Health and Human Services and the
Department of Labor to assist under-employed and unemployed recipients of
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits in finding self-
sufficient employment.
(iv) Such TANF-funded program or policy shall eliminate all asset
limits for eligibility for federal food assistance benefits, except that
the total of liquid assets which includes cash on hand and funds in
personal checking and savings accounts, money market accounts, and share
accounts shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars pursuant to the
-5-

LB46 LB46
2025 2025
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, as allowed under federal law
and under 7 C.F.R. 273.2(j)(2).
(v) This subsection becomes effective only if the department
receives funds pursuant to federal participation that may be used to
implement this subsection.
(c) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Federal law means the federal Food and Nutrition Act of 2008, 7
U.S.C. 2011 et seq., and regulations adopted under the act; and
(ii) TANF means the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families
program established in 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.
(4)(a) Subject to federal approval of any required state plan
amendment, the department shall establish a Restaurant Meals Program as
part of the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program. Under the
Restaurant Meals Program, households with elderly or disabled members and
their spouses, as defined in 7 U.S.C. 2012(j), or homeless individuals,
as defined in 7 U.S.C. 2012(l), shall have the option in accordance with
7 U.S.C. 2012(k) to redeem Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits at private establishments that contract with the department to
offer meals to eligible households at concessional prices subject to 7
U.S.C. 2018(h). The Restaurant Meals Program shall be operational no
later than July 1, 2026.
(b) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
implement this subsection.
(5)(a) (4)(a) Within the limits specified in this subsection, the
State of Nebraska opts out of the provision of the federal Personal
Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, as such
act existed on January 1, 2009, that eliminates eligibility for the
Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program for any person convicted of a
felony involving the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled
substance.
(b) A person shall be ineligible for Supplemental Nutrition
-6-

LB46 LB46
2025 2025
Assistance Program benefits under this subsection if he or she (i) has
had three or more felony convictions for the possession or use of a
controlled substance or (ii) has been convicted of a felony involving the
sale or distribution of a controlled substance or the intent to sell or
distribute a controlled substance. A person with one or two felony
convictions for the possession or use of a controlled substance shall
only be eligible to receive Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program
benefits under this subsection if he or she is participating in or has
completed a state-licensed or nationally accredited substance abuse
treatment program since the date of conviction. The determination of such
participation or completion shall be made by the treatment provider
administering the program.
Sec. 2. Original section 68-1017.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-7-